Hawaii statutes.
[§556A-12] Disclosure of contents of
electronic communications held in trust when trustee not original user.
Unless otherwise ordered by the court, directed by the user, or provided in a
trust, a custodian shall disclose to a trustee that is not an original user of
an account the content of an electronic communication sent or received by an
original or successor user and carried, maintained, processed, received, or
stored by the custodian in the account of the trust if the trustee gives the
custodian:

(1) A written request for disclosure in physical or
electronic form;

(2) A certified copy of the trust instrument that
includes consent to disclosure of the content of electronic communications to
the trustee;

(3) A certification by the trustee, under penalty of
perjury, that the trust exists and the trustee is a currently acting trustee of
the trust; and

(4) If requested by the custodian:

(A) A number, username, address, or other
unique subscriber or account identifier assigned by the custodian to identify
the trust's account; or

(B) Evidence linking the account to the
trust. [L 2016, c 162, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next